Maine, session 132, LD840.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3271, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 405, Pt. A, §65, is
further amended to read:
2. The department, to the extent allowed by Title XVI of the United States Social
Security Act, as amended, and regulations promulgated thereunder, shall establish standard
levels of state supplemental income benefits for blind, disabled and elderly people. The
benefits must be provided under a modified flat benefit system, and may vary by marital
status, and by living arrangements to the extent allowed by Title XVI of the United States
Social Security Act, as amended, and regulations promulgated thereunder. The benefits
may not be based on individual budgeted need and may not vary by category or
geographical area. Benefits for a couple, except as provided under section 3273, subsection
1, paragraph B, must be equal to the sum of the amount of benefit for an each individual
and 50% of the benefit for an individual in the couple.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §3272, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1973, c. 790, §3, is amended to
read:
1. Standard. The standard utilized to determine need shall must be the current annual
budget at the lower level of living for a retired couple an individual as most recently
determined by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for
Portland, Maine, or budgets which that are consistent with such a budget at the lower level
of living, taking into account budget variances by marital status and living arrangements
permited permitted pursuant to Title XVI of the United States Social Security Act, as
amended, and regulations promulgated thereunder.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §3273, sub-§1, ¶A, as enacted by PL 1973, c. 790, §3, is
amended to read:
A. Increase the minimum monthly federal payment standard, in addition to that
established pursuant to federal law, by an amount of at least $8 per month for an
individual and $12 per month for a couple;
Page 1 - 132LR1495(05)

Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §3273, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 1973, c. 790, §3, is
amended to read:
C. For a beneficiary who resides in a living arrangement which that meets a living
arrangement classification established by the department, but who does not reside in
an adult foster home or boarding home, in addition to the minimum federal payment
level as adjusted pursuant to paragraph A, provide, based on such living arrangement
classification, an amount not to exceed $42 per month for an individual and $63 per
month for a couple.
Sec. 5. 22 MRSA §3273, sub-§6, ¶B-1, as enacted by PL 1991, c. 528, Pt. E, §25
and affected by Pt. RRR and enacted by c. 591, Pt. E, §25, is amended to read:
B-1. On July 1st of every year, the sum of the monthly amount of any state
supplemental income benefit authorized by subsection 1, paragraphs A and C, plus the
amount of the minimum monthly federal supplemental security income in effect at that
time must be increased by a percentage amount equal to the percentage rise in the
United States Consumer Price Index for April 1st of that year over the level of the
Index for April 1st of the previous year plus any additional percentage amount as is
recommended annually by the department. Such an increase may be made only insofar
as appropriations are available. In determining the additional percentage amount,
consideration must be given to the goal of reaching, within a reasonable time, a benefit
level equal to or consistent with the current budget at the lower level of living for a
retired couple an individual established by the United States Department of Labor,
Bureau of Labor Statistics, for Portland, Maine.
If, on April 1st of any year, the sum of the monthly amount of any state supplemental
payment authorized by subsection 1, paragraphs A and C, plus the amount of the
minimum monthly federal supplemental security income in effect at that time, is equal
to or exceeds the amount resulting from 12 divided into the current annual budget at
the lower level of living for a retired couple an individual as most recently established
by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for Portland,
Maine, or taking into account variances by marital status and living arrangements as
established by the department, a budget that is not inconsistent with that annual budget
divided by 12, the increase provided on July 1st next following is limited to the
percentage rise in the Consumer Price Index.
This paragraph takes effect July 1, 1993.
Sec. 6. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
State Supplement to Federal Supplemental Security Income 0131
Initiative: Provides funding to make the state supplemental income benefit payment for a
couple, both of whom qualify for the benefit, equal to the sum of the amount of the benefit
for each individual in the couple.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $36,828
__________ __________
Page 2 - 132LR1495(05)

GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $36,828
Page 3 - 132LR1495(05)